Utah statutes.
57-21-6.   Discriminatory housing practices regarding residential real
estate-related transactions -- Discriminatory housing practices regarding the
provisions of brokerage services.
(1)  It is a discriminatory housing practice for any person whose business
includes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions to
discriminate against any person in making available such a transaction, or in
the terms or conditions of the transaction, because of race, color, religion,
sex, disability, familial status, source of income, or national origin.
Residential real estate-related transactions include:
(a)  making or purchasing loans or providing other financial assistance:
(i)  for purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a
dwelling; or
(ii)  secured by residential real estate; or
(b)  selling, brokering, or appraising residential real property.
(2)  It is a discriminatory housing practice to deny any person access to, or
membership or participation in, any multiple-listing service, real estate
brokers' organization, or other service, organization, or facility relating to
the business of selling or renting dwellings or to discriminate against any
person in the terms or conditions of access, membership, or participation in
the organization, service, or facility because of race, color, religion, sex,
disability, familial status, source of income, or national origin.
(3)  This section also applies to discriminatory housing practices because of
race, color, religion, sex, national origin, familial status, source of
income, or disability based upon a person's association with another person.
